Hawaii statutes.
§346‑395 Eligibility. A young adult
may continue to receive services under this part if the young adult meets the following
criteria:

(1) The young adult was:

(A) Under the permanent custody, foster
custody, voluntary foster custody, or court-ordered temporary foster custody of
the department at the time the young adult attained the age of eighteen;

(B) A child who was placed in guardianship after
attaining the age of sixteen and the legal guardians are no longer willing to
provide emotional and financial support; or

(C) A child who was adopted after attaining the
age of sixteen and the adoptive parents are no longer willing to provide
emotional and financial support;

(2) The young adult voluntarily consents to participate
in the young adult voluntary foster care program and meets the program
requirements;

(3) The court finds that exercising jurisdiction under
this part is in the young adult's best interest; and

(4) The young adult is:

(A) Completing secondary education or a program
leading to an equivalent credential;

(B) Enrolled in an institution that provides post‑secondary
or vocational education;

(C) Participating in a program or activity designed
to promote or remove barriers to employment;

(D) Employed for at least eighty hours per month;
or

(E) Incapable of doing any of the activities described
in subparagraphs (A) to (D) due to a medical condition, which incapability is supported
by regularly updated information in the case plan of the young adult. [L 2013,
c 252, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 134, §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next